Utah statutes.
72-2-121.4.   2010 interlocal agreement governing state highway projects in Salt Lake County.

(1)  Under the direction of the attorney general, the state of Utah and Salt Lake County may enter into an interlocal agreement that includes, at minimum, the provisions specified in this section.

(2)  The attorney general shall ensure that, in the agreement, Salt Lake County covenants to:

(a)  issue revenue bonds in an amount generating proceeds of at least $77,000,000, together with additional amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements, and secured by revenues received from the state of Utah under Section 72-2-121.3;

(b)  transfer at least $68,500,000 to the Department of Transportation to be used for state highway projects in Salt Lake County as provided in the interlocal agreement; and

(c)  use or transfer to a municipality to use $8,500,000 to pay all or part of the costs of the following highway construction projects in Salt Lake County in the following amounts:

(i)  $2,000,000 to Salt Lake County for 2300 East in Salt Lake County;

(ii)  $3,500,000 to Salt Lake City for North Temple;

(iii)  $1,500,000 to Murray City for 4800 South; and

(iv)  $1,500,000 to Riverton City for 13400 South -- 4000 West to 4570 West.

(3)  The attorney general shall ensure that, in the agreement, the state of Utah covenants to:

(a)  use the money transferred by Salt Lake County under Subsection (2)(b) to pay all or part of the costs of the following state highway construction or reconstruction projects within Salt Lake County:

(i)  5400 South -- Bangerter Highway to 4000 West;

(ii)  Bangerter Highway at SR-201;

(iii)  12300 South at State Street;

(iv)  Bangerter Highway at 6200 South;

(v)  Bangerter Highway at 7000 South;

(vi)  Bangerter Highway at 3100 South;

(vii)  5400 South -- 4000 West to past 4800 West;

(viii)  9400 South and Wasatch Boulevard; and

(ix)  I-215 West Interchange -- 3500 South to 3800 South and ramp work;

(b)  widen and improve US-89 between 7200 South and 9000 South with available highway funding identified by the commission; and

(c)  transfer to Salt Lake County or its designee from the 2010 Salt Lake County Revenue Bond Sinking Fund the amount certified by Salt Lake County as necessary to pay:

(i)  the debt service on the revenue bonds issued by Salt Lake County; and

(ii)  any additional amounts necessary to pay costs of issuance, pay capitalized interest, and fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(4)  The costs under Subsections (2)(c) and (3)(a) may include the cost of acquiring land, interests in land, easements and rights-of-way, improving sites, and making all improvements necessary, incidental, or convenient to the facilities and all related engineering, architectural, and legal fees.

(5)  In preparing the agreement required by this section, the attorney general and Salt Lake County shall:

(a)  review each existing interlocal agreement with Salt Lake County concerning Salt Lake County revenues received by the state for state highway projects within Salt Lake County; and

(b)  as necessary, modify those agreements or draft a new interlocal agreement encompassing all of the provisions necessary to reflect the state of Utah's and Salt Lake County's obligations for those revenues and projects.

(6)  If project savings are identified by the Department of Transportation from the funds provided to the Department of Transportation as described in Subsection (2)(b) and if the use of funds is not in violation of any agreement, the Department of Transportation shall provide $1,000,000 of the funds described in Subsection (2)(b) to Draper City to pay for highway improvements to 13490 South.

(7)  If project savings are identified from the funds provided to the Department of Transportation as described in Subsection (2)(b) and if the use of funds is not in violation of any agreement, the Department of Transportation shall provide $3,000,000 of the funds described in Subsection (2)(b) and from funds in the County of the First Class State Highway Projects Fund created by Section 72-2-121 to fund the following highway projects:

(a)  $2,000,000 to West Valley City to pay for highway improvements to SR-201 Frontage Road at Bangerter Highway and associated roads to ease traffic flow onto Bangerter Highway between SR-201 and Lake Park Boulevard; and

(b)  $1,000,000 to West Valley City for improvements to SR-201 Frontage Road at 7200 West.

(8)  If project savings are identified by the Department of Transportation from the funds provided to the Department of Transportation as described in Subsection (2)(b) and if the use of funds is not in violation of any agreement, the Department of Transportation shall provide $1,100,000 of the funds described in Subsection (2)(b) and from funds in the County of the First Class State Highway Projects Fund created by Section 72-2-121 to West Jordan City for highway improvements on 4000 West from 7800 South to Old Bingham Highway.

(9)  If project savings are identified by the Department of Transportation from the funds provided to the Department of Transportation as described in Subsection (2)(b) and if the use of funds is not in violation of any agreement, the Department of Transportation shall provide $1,000,000 of the funds described in Subsection (2)(b) and from funds in the County of the First Class State Highway Projects Fund created by Section 72-2-121 to Midvale City to fund the following highway projects:

(a)  $500,000 to Midvale City for improvements to Union Park Avenue from I-215 exit south to Creek Road and Wasatch Boulevard; and

(b)  $500,000 to Midvale City for improvements to 7200 South from I-15 to 700 West.

(10) (a) (i)  Before providing funds to a municipality or county under Subsections (7), (8), and (9), the Department of Transportation shall obtain from the municipality or county:

(A)  a written certification signed by the county or city mayor or the mayor's designee certifying that the municipality or county will use the funds provided under Subsections (7), (8), and (9) solely for the projects described in Subsections (7), (8), and (9); and

(B)  other documents necessary to protect the state and the bondholders and to ensure that all legal requirements are met.

(ii)  Except as provided in Subsection (10)(b), by January 1 of each year, the municipality or county receiving funds described in Subsections (7), (8), and (9) shall submit to the Department of Transportation a statement of cash flow for the current fiscal year detailing the funds necessary to pay project costs for the projects described in Subsections (7), (8), and (9).

(iii)  Except as provided in Subsection (10)(b), after receiving the statement required under Subsection (10)(a)(ii) and after July 1, the Department of Transportation shall provide funds to the municipality or county necessary to pay project costs for the current fiscal year based upon the statement of cash flow submitted by the municipality or county.

(iv)  Upon the financial close of each project described in Subsections (7), (8), and (9), the municipality or county receiving funds under Subsections (7), (8), and (9) shall submit a statement to the Department of Transportation detailing the expenditure of funds received for each project.

(b)  For calendar year 2012 only:

(i)  the municipality or county shall submit to the Department of Transportation a statement of cash flow as provided in Subsection (10)(a)(ii) as soon as possible; and

(ii)  the Department of Transportation shall provide funds to the municipality or county necessary to pay project costs based upon the statement of cash flow.

(c)  The commission or the state treasurer may make any statement of intent relating to a reimbursement under this Subsection (10) that is necessary or desirable to comply with federal tax law.

